New York, session 2025-2026, S8922.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The highway law is amended by adding a new section 344-s to 2 read as follows: 3 § 344-s. Portion of the state highway system to be dedicated to 4 Specialist Thomas Edwin Beglinger. All that portion of the state highway 5 system in the county of Wyoming, constituting state route 98 from School 6 Street in the town of Sheldon at the southern end to the southern line 7 of the village of Attica, shall be dedicated to Specialist Thomas Edwin 8 Beglinger. 9 § 2. The commissioner of transportation shall provide for the instal- 10 lation and maintenance of adequate signing of the state highway system 11 as dedicated pursuant to section one of this act, provided that such 12 signing shall state "Highway Dedicated to Specialist Thomas Edwin 13 Beglinger". However, to avoid confusion and to limit any possible 14 disruption of commerce, the dedication called for pursuant to section 15 one of this act shall be one of ceremonial nature and the official name 16 of such highway shall not be changed as a result of this act. 17 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14484-01-6